Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 27. Marine Products and Motorized Recreational Products.

Effective dates. —

Section 7, ch. 28, SLA 2009 makes this chapter effective May 26, 2009, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 6, ch. 28, SLA 2009, provides that this chapter does not apply to a dealership agreement that is entered into before May 26, 2009.